test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-lex_vyehi_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - vyehi: # ok
    vyehi+N+Sg+Nom:   vyehi
    vyehi+N+Sg+Gen:   vyevi
    vyehi+N+Sg+Acc:   vyevi
    vyehi+N+Sg+Ill:   vuáhán
    vyehi+N+Sg+Loc:   vyevist
    vyehi+N+Sg+Com:   vuovvijn
    vyehi+N+Sg+Abe:   vyevittáá
    vyehi+N+Ess:      vyehhin
    vyehi+N+Par:      vyehhid
    vyehi+N+Pl+Nom:   vyevih
    vyehi+N+Pl+Gen:  vuovij
    vyehi+N+Pl+Acc:   vuovijd
    vyehi+N+Pl+Ill:   vuovvijd
    vyehi+N+Pl+Loc:   vuovijn
    vyehi+N+Pl+Com:   [vuovijguin, vuovijgijn]
    vyehi+N+Pl+Abe:   vuovijttáá
    
  Noun - njäähi: # ok  
    njäähi+N+Sg+Nom:   njäähi
    njäähi+N+Sg+Gen:   njäävi
    njäähi+N+Sg+Ill:   njááhán
    njäähi+N+Sg+Loc:   njäävist
    njäähi+N+Sg+Com:   njavvijn
    njäähi+N+Sg+Abe:   njävittáá
    njäähi+N+Ess:      njäähhin
    njäähi+N+Par:      njäähhid
    njäähi+N+Pl+Nom:   njäävih
    njäähi+N+Pl+Gen:  [njaavij, njavij]
    njäähi+N+Pl+Acc:   njaavijd
    njäähi+N+Pl+Ill:   njavvijd
    njäähi+N+Pl+Loc:   njaavijn
    njäähi+N+Pl+Com:   [njavijguin, njavijgijn]
    njäähi+N+Pl+Abe:   njavijttáá
